Hawaii statutes.
§452-24 Disciplinary actions. (a) In
addition to any other actions authorized by law, the board may take
disciplinary action against any licensee, including, but not limited to,
revocation, suspension, fine, or a combination thereof, or may refuse to grant
or renew a license for any cause authorized by law, including but not limited
to the following:

(1) Procuring a license through fraud,
misrepresentation, or deceit or permitting an unlicensed person to perform
activities which require a license under this chapter;

(2) Conviction of any crime involving moral
turpitude;

(3) Practicing massage while the ability to practice
is impaired by alcohol, drugs, physical disability, or mental instability;

(4) Failure to display a license as provided in this
chapter;

(5) Professional misconduct, gross carelessness, or
manifest incapacity in the practice of massage;

(6) Violating this chapter or the rules adopted
pursuant thereto;

(7) Failing to comply with a board order;

(8) Any other conduct constituting fraudulent or
dishonest dealings;

(9) Making a false statement on any document
submitted or required to be filed by this chapter; or

(10) Any representation, or the use of any
designation, which states or implies that the person is able to perform a
technique of massage which the person is not trained to perform.

(b) Any person who violates any of the
provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant thereto shall be fined
not less than $100 nor more than $1,000 for each violation. [L 1986, c 99, §1
and c 310, §2; am L 1992, c 202, §97]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next